es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Hockey de mesa > Equipamiento para hockey de mesa: Discos de hockey de aire; Empujadores de hockey de aire
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Léghoki > Léghoki-felszerelés: Léghokikorongok; Léghokitolók
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Air Hockey > Air Hockey Equipment: Air Hockey Pucks; Air Hockey Pushers
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Ilmakiekko > Ilmakiekkovälineet: Ilmakiekot; Ilmakiekon mailat
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Airhockey > Udstyr til airhockey: Airhockey – pucker; Airhockey – skubbere
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Zračni hokej > Oprema za zračni hokej: Paki za zračni hokej; Ročke za zračni hokej
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 空气曲棍球 > 空气曲棍球设备: 空气曲棍球用球; 空气曲棍球推杆
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Χόκεϊ αέρος > Εξοπλισμός χόκεϊ αέρος: Δίσκοι χόκεϊ αέρος; Σπρωχτήρες χόκεϊ αέρος
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > エアホッケー用品 > エアホッケー用具: エアホッケーパック; エアホッケープッシャー
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Hóquei aéreo > Equipamento de hóquei aéreo: Discos de hóquei de mesa; Empurradores de hóquei de mesa
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 空氣曲棍球 > 氣墊球裝備: 氣墊球; 氣墊球棍
ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Аэрохоккей > Инвентарь для аэрохоккея: Шайбы для аэрохоккея; Биты для аэрохоккея
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Air-Hockey > Air-Hockey-Ausrüstung: Air-Hockey-Pucks; Air-Hockey-Pusher
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Въздушен хокей > Оборудване за въздушен хокей: Шайби за въздушен хокей; Дръжки за въздушен хокей
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Stolní hokej > Vybavení na stolní hokej: Vzdušný hokej –⁠ puky; Vzdušný hokej –⁠ hokejky
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Vzdušný hokej > Vybavenie na vzdušný hokej: Puky na vzdušný hokej; Odrážače na vzdušný hokej
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Hóquei de ar > Equipamento de hóquei de ar: Discos de hóquei de ar; Empurradores de hóquei de ar
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > แอร์ฮอกกี้ > อุปกรณ์แอร์ฮอกกี้: ลูกแอร์ฮอกกี้; ไม้ดันลูกแอร์ฮอกกี้
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Air hockey > Echipamente pentru air hockey: Pucuri pentru air hockey; Crose pentru air hockey
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Air hockey > Attrezzature per air hockey: Dischi da air hockey; Pusher da air hockey
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Air Hockey > Équipement de air hockey: Palets de air hockey; Poussoirs de air hockey
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Lufthockey > Utstyr til lufthockey: Pucker til air hockey; Pushere til air hockey
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 에어 하키 > 에어 하키 장비: 에어 하키 퍽; 에어 하키 푸셔
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Stolni hokej > Oprema za stolni hokej: Pakovi za stolni hokej; Gurači za stolni hokej
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Air hockey > Air hockey-benodigdheden: Air hockey-pucks; Air hockey-duwers
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Air hockey > Sprzęt do air hockey'a: Krążki do air hockey'a; Popychacze do air hockey'a
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Hava Hokeyi > Hava Hokeyi Ekipmanları: Hava Hokeyi Diskleri; Hava Hokeyi İticileri
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Air hockey > Lufthockeyutrustning: Air hockey-puckar; Air hockey-påskjutare
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Oro ritulys > Oro ritulio įranga: Oro ritulio rituliai; Oro ritulio stūmikliai
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Khúc côn cầu bàn > Thiết bị chơi khúc côn cầu trên bàn: Bóng chơi khúc côn cầu trên bàn; Tay đẩy khúc côn cầu trên bàn